Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2306
Board, defined.

Board means the Board of Nursing.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 15;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 30;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1708;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 798;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 15.
July 1, 2026